Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6904HV (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2779 Section 1. Section 99D.11, subsection 6, paragraph c, 1 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended to read as 2 follows: 3 (1) The commission shall authorize the licensee of the horse 4 racetrack located in Polk county an entity that complies with 5 section 99D.9D to conduct advance deposit wagering. An advance 6 deposit wager may be placed in person at a licensed racetrack 7 enclosure, or from any other location via a telephone-type 8 device or any other electronic means , except that an advance 9 deposit wager shall not be placed via a telephone-type device 10 or other electronic means from a location within five miles 11 of a licensed racetrack enclosure unless the advance deposit 12 wagering operator has entered into an agreement with the 13 racetrack licensee to authorize such wagers . The commission 14 may also issue an advance deposit wagering operator license 15 to an entity who complies with subparagraph (3) and section 16 99D.8A . 17 (2) For the purposes of this section , âadvance deposit 18 wageringâ means a method of pari-mutuel wagering in which an 19 individual may establish an account, deposit money into the 20 account, and use the account balance to pay for pari-mutuel 21 wagering. Of the net revenue, less all taxes paid and expenses 22 directly related to account deposit wagering incurred by the 23 licensee of the horse racetrack located in Polk county an 24 entity that complies with section 99D.9D , received through 25 advance deposit wagering, fifty percent shall be designated for 26 the horse purses created pursuant to section 99D.7, subsection 27 5 , and fifty percent shall be designated for the licensee for 28 the pari-mutuel horse racetrack located in Polk county entity 29 that complies with section 99D.9D . 30